Maryland, session 2025, HB0468.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
10–623.
(a) If the petitioner under Part IV of this subtitle is not a physician, psychologist,
clinical social worker, licensed clinical professional counselor, clinical nurse specialist in
psychiatric and mental health nursing, psychiatric nurse practitioner, licensed clinical
marriage and family therapist, health officer or designee of a health officer, or peace officer,
the petitioner shall present the petition to the court for immediate review.
(b) After review of the petition, the court shall endorse the petition if the court
finds probable cause to believe that the emergency evaluee has shown the symptoms of a
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0468*

HOUSE BILL 468
mental disorder and that the individual presents a danger to the life or safety of the
individual or of others.
(c) If the court does not find probable cause, the court shall indicate that fact on
the petition, and no further action may be taken under the petition.
(D) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE PETITION
SHALL BE EFFECTIVE FOR 5 DAYS AFTER BEING ENDORSED BY THE COURT UNDER
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, ON
A MOTION, THE COURT MAY EXTEND THE PETITION FOR GOOD CAUSE SHOWN BASED
ON THE PRESENTING BEHAVIOR OF THE INDIVIDUAL FOR UP TO 5 DAYS AT A TIME,
BUT NOT TO EXCEED A TOTAL OF 30 DAYS.
(II) 1. A MOTION UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH MUST BE MADE BY THE ORIGINAL PETITIONER.
2. EACH EXTENSION SHALL BE BASED ON A SEPARATE
MOTION.
(3) A PETITION ENDORSED OR EXTENDED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION
SHALL BE SERVED EXPEDITIOUSLY.
(E) THE COURT SHALL INCLUDE ON THE PETITION THE DATE THE PETITION
EXPIRES.
10–624.
(a) (1) A peace officer shall take an emergency evaluee to the nearest
emergency facility if the peace officer has a petition under Part IV of this subtitle that:
(i) 1. Has been endorsed by a court [within the last 5 days]; AND
2. IS IN EFFECT; or
(ii) Is signed and submitted by a physician, psychologist, clinical
social worker, licensed clinical professional counselor, clinical nurse specialist in
psychiatric and mental health nursing, psychiatric nurse practitioner, licensed clinical
marriage and family therapist, health officer or designee of a health officer, or peace officer.
(2) The petition required under paragraph (1) of this subsection may be:
(i) In the form of an electronic record; and
(ii) Transmitted and received electronically.

HOUSE BILL 468 3
(3) A PEACE OFFICER MAY USE FORCE IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 3–524
OF THE PUBLIC SAFETY ARTICLE WHEN EXECUTING A PETITION.
[(3)] (4) To the extent practicable, a peace officer shall notify the
emergency facility in advance that the peace officer is bringing an emergency evaluee to
the emergency facility.
[(4)] (5) After a peace officer brings the emergency evaluee to an
emergency facility, the peace officer need not stay unless, because the emergency evaluee
is violent, emergency facility personnel ask the supervisor of the peace officer to have the
peace officer stay.
[(5)] (6) A peace officer shall stay until the supervisor responds to the
request for assistance. If the emergency evaluee is violent, the supervisor shall allow the
peace officer to stay.
[(6)] (7) If emergency facility personnel ask that a peace officer stay, a
physician shall examine the emergency evaluee as promptly as possible.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.